Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3108
Membership in the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association; prohibited.

Any professional association mutual insurance company shall not be a member of the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association described in Chapter 44, article 24.

Laws 1978, LB 656, § 8.